Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB40.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "feminine hygiene product" includes but is not limited to
tampons, sanitary napkins, menstrual sponges, menstrual cups, and similar
menstrual hygiene products.
(2) All public schools and public charter schools that include any of grades four (4)
through twelve (12) shall make at least one (1) type of age-appropriate feminine
hygiene product available in each school building for use by female students at
no cost.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 158.1415 to the contrary, each local board
of education and public charter school board of directors shall adopt policies:
(a) Establishing procedures for the distribution of age-appropriate feminine
hygiene products for use by female students and related guidance regarding
the safe and healthy use of the products; and
(b) Prohibiting the resale, redistribution, or misuse of feminine hygiene
products distributed to female students under this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 9/4/2025 10:15 AM Jacketed